District of Columbia statutes.
47-1817.03

Tax credit to Qualified High Technology Companies for wages to qualified employees; exceptions.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2000, a Qualified High Technology Company shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by § 47-1817.06 equal to 10% of the wages paid during the first 24 calendar months of employment to a qualified employee hired after December 31, 2000.

(b)

The credit under subsection (a) of this section shall not be allowed:

(1)

To exceed, for each qualified employee, $5,000 in a taxable year;

(2)

If the Qualified High Technology Company accords the qualified employee lesser benefits or rights than it accords other employees in similar jobs;

(3)

If the qualified employee was employed as the result of:

(A)

The displacement, other than for cause, of another employee;

(B)

A strike or lockout;

(C)

A layoff in which other employees are awaiting recall; or

(D)

A reduction of the regular wages, benefits, or rights of other employees in similar jobs; or

(4)

If the qualified employee is a member of the board of directors of the Qualified High Technology Company or, directly or indirectly, owns a majority of its stock.

(c)

If the amount of the credit allowable under this section exceeds the tax otherwise due from a Qualified High Technology Company, the unused amount of the credit may be carried forward for 10 years.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-256, § 202(b), 48 DCR 730
This section is referenced in § 47-1818.01 and § 47-1818.06.